Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 4. Consent to and Relinquishment for Adoption

§ 2-401.
Persons whose consent to adoption is required.

Unless consent is not required or is dispensed with by section 2-402 of this title, in a direct placement of a minor for adoption by a parent or guardian authorized under this title to place the minor, a petition to adopt the minor may be granted only if consent to the adoption has been executed by:

the woman who gave birth to the minor;

the biological father identified by the mother or as otherwise known to the court;

a man who is or has been married to the woman if the minor was born during the marriage or within 300 days after the marriage was terminated or a court issued a decree of separation;

a man who:

was not married to the minor’s mother at the time of the child’s birth;

has acknowledged his paternity of the minor by executing a voluntary acknowledgment of paternity under

15 V.S.A. § 307

or has filed a notice to retain parental rights under section 1-110 of this title; and

has demonstrated a commitment to the responsibilities of parenthood by establishing a custodial, personal, or financial relationship with the child, unless he was prevented from demonstrating such commitment or was unable to demonstrate such commitment; and

the minor’s guardian if expressly authorized by a court to consent to the minor’s adoption; or

the current adoptive or other legally recognized mother and father of the minor.

Unless consent is not required under section 2-402 of this title, in a placement of a minor for adoption by an agency authorized under this title to place the minor, a petition to adopt the minor may be granted only if consent to the adoption has been executed by:

the agency that placed the minor for adoption; and

a person described in subsection (a) who has not relinquished the minor or had his or her parental rights terminated.

Unless the court dispenses with the minor’s consent, a petition to adopt a minor who has attained 14 years of age may be granted only if, in addition to any consent required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the minor has executed an informed consent to the adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 2-402.
Persons whose consent not required.

Consent to an adoption of a minor is not required of:

a person who has relinquished parental rights or guardianship powers, including the right to consent to adoption, to an agency pursuant to this part of this article;

a person whose parental relationship to the minor has been judicially terminated or determined not to exist;

a man who has not been married to the woman who gave birth to the minor and who, after the conception of the minor, executes a notarized statement denying paternity or disclaiming any interest in the minor and acknowledging that his statement is irrevocable when executed;

the personal representative of a deceased parent’s estate; or

a parent or other person who has not executed a consent or a relinquishment and who fails to file an answer or make an appearance in a proceeding for adoption or for termination of a parental relationship within the requisite time after service of notice of the proceeding.

The court may dispense with the consent of:

a guardian or an agency whose consent is otherwise required upon a finding that the consent is being withheld unreasonably, contrary to the best interest of a minor adoptee; or

a minor adoptee who has attained 14 years of age upon a finding that it is not in the best interest of the minor to require the consent.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-403.
Persons who may relinquish minor.

A parent or guardian whose consent to the adoption of a minor is required by section 2-401 of this title may relinquish to an agency all rights with respect to the minor, including legal and physical custody and the right to consent to the minor’s adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-404.
Time and prerequisites for execution of consent or relinquishment.

A parent whose consent to the adoption of a minor is required by section 2-401 of this title may not execute a consent or a relinquishment sooner than 36 hours after the minor is born. A parent who executes a consent or relinquishment may revoke the consent or relinquishment within 21 days after the consent or relinquishment is executed by filing a written notice in the court in which the consent was executed.

A guardian may execute a consent to the adoption of a minor or a relinquishment at any time after being authorized by a court to do so.

An agency that places a minor for adoption may execute its consent at any time before or during the hearing on the petition for adoption.

A minor adoptee whose consent is required may execute a consent at any time at or before the hearing on the petition for adoption.

Before executing a consent or relinquishment, a parent shall have been informed of the meaning and consequences of adoption, the availability of personal and legal counseling, the consequences of misidentifying the other parent, the procedure for releasing information about the health and other characteristics of the parent which may affect the physical or psychological well-being of the adoptee, and the procedure for the release of the parent’s identity pursuant to Article 6 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-405.
Procedure for execution of consent or relinquishment.

A consent or relinquishment executed by a parent or guardian under this title shall be signed in the presence of:

a judge of a court that has jurisdiction over adoption proceedings in this or in any other state;

a person appointed by a probate judge to take consents or relinquishments;

a commissioned officer on active duty in the military service of the United States, if the person executing the consent or relinquishment is in military service; or

an officer of the foreign service or a consular officer of the United States in another country, if the person executing the consent or relinquishment is in that country.

A consent executed by a minor adoptee shall be signed in the presence of the judge before whom the proceeding is pending.

A parent who is a minor is competent to execute a consent or relinquishment if the parent has had the advice of an attorney who is not representing an adoptive parent or the agency to which the parent’s child is relinquished. The attorney shall be present when the consent or relinquishment is executed.

A person before whom a consent or relinquishment is signed under subsection (a) of this section shall certify in writing that he or she orally explained the contents and consequences of the consent or relinquishment and, to the best of the person’s knowledge or belief, the person executing the consent or relinquishment:

read or was read the consent or relinquishment and understood it;

signed the consent or relinquishment voluntarily;

received or was offered a copy of the consent or relinquishment and the information described in subsection 2-404(e) of this title;

if a parent, understands that personal counseling was available by a certified adoption counselor or other counselor of his or her choice;

if a parent who is a minor, was advised by an attorney who is not representing an adoptive parent or the agency to which the parent’s child is being relinquished, or, if an adult, was informed of the right to have an attorney who is not representing an adoptive parent or an agency to which the parent’s child is being relinquished;

if a mother who has not identified a biological father, has responded to inquiries under section 3-404 of this title; and

if a parent who has identified another parent who is deceased, has provided the names and addresses of persons described in subdivision 3-401(a)(6) of this title.

A prospective adoptive parent named or described in a consent to the adoption of a minor shall sign a statement indicating an intention to adopt the minor, acknowledging an obligation to return legal and physical custody of the minor to the minor’s parent if the parent revokes the consent within the time specified in subsection 2-404(a) of this title, and acknowledging responsibility for the minor’s support and medical and other care if the consent is not revoked.

If an agency accepts a relinquishment, an employee of the agency shall sign a statement accepting the relinquishment, acknowledging its obligation to return legal and physical custody of the child to the minor’s parent if the parent revokes the relinquishment within the time indicated in subsection 2-404(a), and acknowledging responsibility for the minor’s support and medical and other care if the relinquishment is not revoked.

A person before whom a consent or a relinquishment is signed or confirmed shall certify having received the statements required by subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

A consent by an agency to the adoption of a minor in the agency’s legal custody shall be executed by the head of the agency or a person authorized by the agency and shall be signed or confirmed under oath in the presence of a person authorized to take acknowledgments.

A consent or relinquishment executed in another state or country is valid if in accordance with this title or with the law and procedure of the state or country in which executed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-406.
Content of consent or relinquishment.

A consent or relinquishment required from a parent or guardian under this title shall be in writing and contain, in plain English or, if the native language of the parent or guardian is a language other than English, in that language:

the name, date of birth, and current mailing address of the individual executing the consent or relinquishment;

the date of birth and the name of the minor adoptee;

if a consent, the name, address, and telephone number of the attorney representing the prospective adoptive parent with whom the individual executing the consent has placed or intends to place the minor for adoption;

if a relinquishment, the name, address, and telephone number of the agency to which the minor is being relinquished;

specific instructions as to how to revoke the consent or relinquishment and how to commence an action to set it aside;

the name and address of the court, if known to the parent, in which the petition for adoption has been or will be filed, or if unknown to the parent, the name and address of a court in which a motion to set aside a consent on the ground of fraud or coercion may be filed.

A consent shall state that the parent or guardian executing the document is voluntarily and unequivocally consenting to the transfer of legal and physical custody to, and the adoption of the minor by, a specific adoptive parent whom the parent or guardian has selected.

A relinquishment shall state that the individual executing the relinquishment voluntarily consents to the permanent transfer of legal and physical custody of the minor to the agency for the purposes of adoption.

A consent or relinquishment shall state:

an understanding that after the consent or relinquishment is executed in substantial compliance with section 2-405 of this title, it is final and, except under a circumstance stated in sections 2-408 or 2-409 of this title, or subsection (e) of this section may not be revoked or set aside for any reason, including the failure of an adoptive parent to permit the individual executing the consent or relinquishment to visit or communicate with the minor adoptee;

an understanding that the consent or relinquishment will extinguish all parental rights and obligations the individual executing the consent or relinquishment has with respect to the minor adoptee;

an understanding that the adoption will terminate completely every aspect of the legal relationship between the adoptee and the person executing the consent or relinquishment has with respect to the minor adoptee, except for arrearages of child support, and will remain valid whether or not any agreement for visitation or communication with the minor adoptee is later performed;

that the individual executing the consent or relinquishment has:

received a copy of the consent or relinquishment;

been advised, if a parent who is a minor, by an attorney who is not representing an adoptive parent or the agency to which the minor adoptee is being relinquished, or, if an adult, has been informed of the right to have an attorney who is not representing an adoptive parent or the agency;

been provided the information described in subsection 2-404(e) of this title;

been advised of the obligation to provide the information required under section 2-105 of this title;

if a parent, understands that personal counseling was available by a certified adoption counselor or other counselor of his or her choice; and

been informed that it is in the best interests of the child to keep the court or agency informed of his or her current address and any family health problem which the parent develops or becomes aware of which could affect the child, in order for the court or agency to respond to any inquiry concerning the adoptee’s medical or social history;

that the individual executing the consent or relinquishment has not received or been promised any money or anything of value for the consent or the relinquishment, except for payments authorized by Article 7 of this title that are itemized on a schedule attached to the consent or relinquishment;

that the minor is or is not an Indian child as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. §§ 1901 et seq.;

that the individual believes the adoption of the minor is in the minor’s best interests;

that the individual who is consenting or relinquishing:

does not waive notice of any proceeding for adoption; or

waives notice of any proceeding for adoption; or

waives notice unless the adoption is contested, appealed, or denied; and

an understanding that the adoption will make an order or agreement for visitation or communication with the minor unenforceable; and

for the purpose of evaluating the reasonableness of reimbursement or expenses as provided for in section 7-103 of this title, whether the individual executing the consent or relinquishment has received any public assistance during the last 12 months.

A consent or relinquishment may provide for its revocation if:

another consent or relinquishment is not executed within a specified period;

a court decides not to terminate another individual’s parental relationship to the minor; or

in a direct placement for adoption, a petition for adoption by a prospective adoptive parent, named or described in the consent, is denied or withdrawn.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-407.
Consequences of consent or relinquishment.

Except under a circumstance stated in section 2-408 of this title, a consent to the adoption of a minor, which consent is executed by a parent or guardian in substantial compliance with sections 2-405 and 2-406 of this title, is final and irrevocable 21 days after execution, and:

unless a court orders otherwise to protect the welfare of the minor, entitles the prospective adoptive parent named or described in the consent to the legal and physical custody of the minor, and imposes on that person responsibility for the support and medical and other care of the minor;

terminates any responsibility of a parent who executed the consent with respect to the minor, including child support (except for arrearages) upon filing the consent with the Family Division of the Superior Court that entered the child support order and notifying the office of child support; and

terminates any right of a parent or guardian who executed the consent to object to the minor’s adoption by the prospective adoptive parent unless otherwise provided in the consent.

Except under a circumstance stated in section 2-409 of this title, a relinquishment of a minor to an agency executed in substantial compliance with sections 2-405 and 2-406 is final and irrevocable 21 days after it is executed, and:

unless a court orders otherwise to protect the welfare of the minor, entitles the agency to the legal custody of the minor until a decree of adoption becomes final;

empowers the agency to:

place the minor for adoption;

consent to the minor’s adoption; and

delegate to a prospective adoptive parent responsibility for the support and medical and other care of the minor;

terminates any responsibility of the person who executed the relinquishment with respect to the minor, including child support (except for arrearages) upon filing the relinquishment with the Family Division of the Superior Court that entered the child support order notifying the office of child support; and

terminates any right of the person who executed the relinquishment to object to the minor’s adoption and, unless otherwise provided in the relinquishment, any right to notice of the proceeding for adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

, § 238.

§ 2-408.
Revocation of consent.

In a direct placement of a minor for adoption by a parent or guardian, and before the adoption is finalized, a consent is revoked if:

within 21 days after the consent is executed, a parent who executed the consent notifies the court in writing that the parent revokes the consent, or the parent complies with any other instructions for revocation specified in the consent; or

the person who executed the consent and the prospective adoptive parent named or described in the consent agree to its revocation.

In a direct placement of a minor for adoption by a parent or guardian, the court shall set aside the consent if the person who executed the consent establishes:

by clear and convincing evidence, before a decree of adoption is issued, that the consent was obtained by fraud or duress;

by a preponderance of the evidence before a decree of adoption is issued that, without good cause shown, a petition to adopt was not filed within 45 days after the minor was placed for adoption, unless the 45-day period was extended by the court, in which event the petition to adopt was not filed within the extended period set by the court; or

by a preponderance of the evidence, that a condition permitting revocation has occurred, as expressly provided for in the consent pursuant to section 2-406 of this title.

If the consent of a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the minor was placed for adoption or when the consent was executed is revoked, the prospective adoptive parent shall immediately return the minor to the custody of the person who executed the consent and move to dismiss a proceeding for adoption or termination of the person’s parental relationship to the minor. If the minor is not returned immediately, the person may petition the court named in the consent for appropriate relief. The court shall hear the petition expeditiously.

If the consent of a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the minor was placed for adoption or when the consent was executed is set aside under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the court shall order the immediate return of the minor to the custody of the person and dismiss a proceeding for adoption.

If the consent of a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the minor was placed for adoption or when the consent was executed is set aside under subdivision (b)(2) or (3) of this section and no ground exists under Article 3, Part 5 of this title, for terminating the relationship of parent and child between the person and the minor, the court shall dismiss a proceeding for adoption and order the immediate return of the minor to the custody of the person, unless the court finds that return will be detrimental to the minor.

If the consent of a person who did not have physical custody of a minor when the minor was placed for adoption or when the consent was executed is revoked or set aside and no ground exists under Article 3, Part 5 of this title, for terminating the relationship of parent and child between the person and the minor, the court shall dismiss a proceeding for adoption and issue an order providing for the care and custody of the minor according to the best interests of the minor.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2-409.
Revocation of relinquishment.

A relinquishment under this title is revoked if:

within 21 days after a relinquishment is executed, a parent who executed the relinquishment gives written notice to the court in which the relinquishment was signed and the agency to which the minor has been relinquished that the parent revokes the relinquishment, or the parent complies with any other instructions for revocation specified in the relinquishment; or

the person who executed the relinquishment and the agency that accepted it agree to its revocation.

The court shall set aside a relinquishment if the person who executed the relinquishment establishes:

by clear and convincing evidence, before a decree of adoption is issued, that the relinquishment was obtained by fraud or duress; or

by a preponderance of the evidence, that a condition permitting revocation has occurred, as expressly provided for in the relinquishment pursuant to section 2-406 of this title.

If a relinquishment by a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the relinquishment was executed is revoked, the agency shall immediately return the minor to the person’s custody and move to dismiss a proceeding for adoption. If the minor is not returned immediately, the person may petition the court named in the relinquishment for appropriate relief. The court shall hear the petition expeditiously.

If a relinquishment by a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the relinquishment was executed is set aside under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the court shall dismiss any proceeding for adoption and order the immediate return of the minor to the custody of the person.

If a relinquishment by a person who had legal and physical custody of a minor when the relinquishment was executed is set aside under subdivision (b)(2) of this section and no ground exists under Article 3, Part 5 of this title, for terminating the relationship of parent and child between the person and the minor, the court shall dismiss a proceeding for adoption and order the immediate return of the minor to the custody of the person, unless the court finds that return will be detrimental to the minor.

If a relinquishment by a person who did not have physical custody of a minor when the relinquishment was executed is revoked or set aside and no ground exists under Article 3, Part 5, for terminating the relationship of parent and child between the person and the minor, the court shall dismiss a proceeding for adoption and shall issue an order providing for the care and custody of the minor according to the best interests of the minor.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.